Rhode Island, session 2025, HB6405.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Legislative findings.
(1) Trees filter pollutants from the air and water, improving air and water quality.
(2) Trees provide shade, which helps cool down urban areas and reduce the "urban heat
island effect."
(3) Trees store carbon, helping to reduce greenhouse gas emissions and combat climate
change.
(4) Trees improve soil water retention, and reduce the risk of flooding by absorbing excess
rainfall.
(5) Trees can reduce energy costs for cooling buildings by providing shade and reducing
the need for air conditioning.
(6) Trees also provide social benefits, including public health, wildlife habitat and
community wellbeing.
SECTION 2. Section 2-15-11 of the General Laws in Chapter 2-15 entitled "Protection of
Trees and Plants Generally" is hereby amended to read as follows:
2-15-11. Penalty for violations of §§ 2-15-6, 2-15-8, 2-15-9, and 2-15-10.
(a) Any person, firm or corporation violating the provisions of §§ 2-15-6, 2-15-8, 2-15-9,
or 2-15-10, shall be punished by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) two hundred
dollars ($200) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500) one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each

offense.
(b) The director of the department of environmental management has the authority to order
anyone convicted of violating § 2-15-8 or any governmental entity which the director determines
violated § 2-15-8 to plant a replacement tree or trees, the sum of the diameters of which are equal
to twice three (3) times that removed or damaged, in the immediate vicinity of the tree removed.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002979
========
LC002979 - Page 2 of 3